Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1447SV (1) 91 ll/ns S.F. 395 Section 1. Section 99F.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. âAccount sharingâ means entering into 3 or participating in an agreement between two or more persons 4 to, either temporarily or permanently, share access to a 5 personâs account with the purpose of concealing a personâs 6 identity, which account has been established with a licensee 7 to participate in gambling games or sports wagering under this 8 chapter. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 25A. âProxy bettingâ means any wagering or 10 betting activity, including a request of another to engage in 11 wagering or betting activity, involving two or more persons, 12 where one person places a wager on behalf of another person 13 with the intent to hide or conceal the bettorâs identity. 14 Sec. 2. Section 99F.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. A person engaging in proxy betting or 17 account sharing is in violation of section 725.7. 18 Sec. 3. Section 725.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. Except as permitted in chapters 99B , and 99D , 99E, and 21 99F, a person shall not do any of the following: 22 a. Participate in a game for any sum of money or other 23 property of any value. 24 b. Make any bet. 25 c. For a fee, directly or indirectly, give or accept 26 anything of value to be wagered or to be transmitted or 27 delivered for a wager to be placed within or without outside of 28 the state of Iowa. 29 d. For a fee, deliver anything of value which has been 30 received outside the enclosure of a racetrack licensed under 31 chapter 99D , or outside of a gambling structure, to be placed 32 as wagers a wager in the pari-mutuel pool or other authorized 33 systems system of wagering. 34 e. Engage in bookmaking, except as permitted in chapters 99E 35 -1- LSB 1447SV (1) 91 ll/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 395 and 99F . 1 f. Engage in proxy betting as defined in section 99F.1. 2 g. Engage in account sharing as defined in section 99F.1. 3